Illinois, session 104th, HB5099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Identification Act is amended by 5changing Section 2.1 and by adding Section 3.4 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2630/2.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 206-2.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-459)8    Sec. 2.1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and 9accurate criminal records of the Illinois State Police, it is 10necessary for all policing bodies of this State, the clerk of 11the circuit court, the Illinois Department of Corrections, the 12sheriff of each county, and State's Attorney of each county to 13submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition 14information to the Illinois State Police for filing at the 15earliest time possible. Unless otherwise noted herein, it 16shall be the duty of all policing bodies of this State, the 17clerk of the circuit court, the Illinois Department of 18Corrections, the sheriff of each county, and the State's 19Attorney of each county to report such information as provided 20in this Section, both in the form and manner required by the 21Illinois State Police and within 30 days of the criminal 22history event. Specifically:23        (a) Arrest Information. All agencies making arrests   HB5099 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    for offenses which are required by statute to be 2    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 3    State Police shall be responsible for furnishing daily to 4    the Illinois State Police fingerprints, charges and 5    descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such 6    offenses. All such agencies shall also notify the Illinois 7    State Police of all decisions by the arresting agency not 8    to refer such arrests for prosecution. With approval of 9    the Illinois State Police, an agency making such arrests 10    may enter into arrangements with other agencies for the 11    purpose of furnishing daily such fingerprints, charges and 12    descriptions to the Illinois State Police upon its behalf.13        (b) Charge Information. The State's Attorney of each 14    county shall notify the Illinois State Police of all 15    charges filed and all petitions filed alleging that a 16    minor is delinquent, including all those added subsequent 17    to the filing of a case, and whether charges were not filed 18    in cases for which the Illinois State Police has received 19    information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph 20    (a) of this Section. With approval of the Illinois State 21    Police, the State's Attorney may enter into arrangements 22    with other agencies for the purpose of furnishing the 23    information required by this subsection (b) to the 24    Illinois State Police upon the State's Attorney's behalf.25        (c) Disposition Information. The clerk of the circuit 26    court of each county shall furnish the Illinois State   HB5099 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    Police, in the form and manner required by the Supreme 2    Court, with all final dispositions of cases for which the 3    Illinois State Police has received information required to 4    be reported pursuant to paragraph (a) or (d) of this 5    Section. Such information shall include, for each charge, 6    all (1) judgments of not guilty, judgments of guilty 7    including the sentence pronounced by the court with 8    statutory citations to the relevant sentencing provision, 9    findings that a minor is delinquent and any sentence made 10    based on those findings, discharges and dismissals in the 11    court; (2) reviewing court orders filed with the clerk of 12    the circuit court which reverse or remand a reported 13    conviction or findings that a minor is delinquent or that 14    vacate or modify a sentence or sentence made following a 15    trial that a minor is delinquent; (3) continuances to a 16    date certain in furtherance of an order of supervision 17    granted under Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of 18    Corrections or an order of probation granted under Section 19    10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 20    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 21    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 22    Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of 23    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 24    Section 10-102 of the Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug 25    Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of the Substance Use 26    Disorder Act, Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act, or   HB5099 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    Section 5-615 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; (4) 2    judgments or court orders terminating or revoking a 3    sentence to or juvenile disposition of probation, 4    supervision or conditional discharge and any resentencing 5    or new court orders entered by a juvenile court relating 6    to the disposition of a minor's case involving delinquency 7    after such revocation; and (5) in any case in which a 8    firearm is alleged to have been used in the commission of 9    an offense, the serial number of any firearm involved in 10    the case, or if the serial number was obliterated, as 11    provided by the State's Attorney to the clerk of the 12    circuit court at the time of disposition.13        (d) Fingerprints After Sentencing.14            (1) After the court pronounces sentence, sentences 15        a minor following a trial in which a minor was found to 16        be delinquent or issues an order of supervision or an 17        order of probation granted under Section 10 of the 18        Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the Illinois 19        Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 20        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 21        Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 22        12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 23        Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 24        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 25        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, Section 10 of 26        the Steroid Control Act, or Section 5-615 of the   HB5099 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for any offense which is 2        required by statute to be collected, maintained, or 3        disseminated by the Illinois State Police, the State's 4        Attorney of each county shall ask the court to order a 5        law enforcement agency to fingerprint immediately all 6        persons appearing before the court who have not 7        previously been fingerprinted for the same case. The 8        court shall so order the requested fingerprinting, if 9        it determines that any such person has not previously 10        been fingerprinted for the same case. The law 11        enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints to 12        the Illinois State Police daily.13            (2) After the court pronounces sentence or makes a 14        disposition of a case following a finding of 15        delinquency for any offense which is not required by 16        statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated 17        by the Illinois State Police, the prosecuting attorney 18        may ask the court to order a law enforcement agency to 19        fingerprint immediately all persons appearing before 20        the court who have not previously been fingerprinted 21        for the same case. The court may so order the requested 22        fingerprinting, if it determines that any so sentenced 23        person has not previously been fingerprinted for the 24        same case. The law enforcement agency may retain such 25        fingerprints in its files.26        (e) Corrections Information. The Illinois Department   HB5099 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    of Corrections and the sheriff of each county shall 2    furnish the Illinois State Police with all information 3    concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death, release, 4    pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of 5    executive clemency or discharge of an individual who has 6    been sentenced or committed to the agency's custody for 7    any offenses which are mandated by statute to be 8    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 9    State Police. For an individual who has been charged with 10    any such offense and who escapes from custody or dies 11    while in custody, all information concerning the receipt 12    and escape or death, whichever is appropriate, shall also 13    be so furnished to the Illinois State Police.14        (f) Confidentiality of information. Information 15    reported to the Illinois State Police under this Act is 16    confidential and shall not be released unless expressly 17    permitted by State or federal law.18(Source: P.A. 104-5, eff. 1-1-26.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-459)20    Sec. 2.1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and 21accurate criminal records of the Illinois State Police, it is 22necessary for all policing bodies of this State, the clerk of 23the circuit court, the Illinois Department of Corrections, the 24sheriff of each county, and State's Attorney of each county to 25submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition   HB5099 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1information to the Illinois State Police for filing at the 2earliest time possible. Unless otherwise noted herein, it 3shall be the duty of all policing bodies of this State, the 4clerk of the circuit court, the Illinois Department of 5Corrections, the sheriff of each county, and the State's 6Attorney of each county to report such information as provided 7in this Section, both in the form and manner required by the 8Illinois State Police and within 30 days of the criminal 9history event. Specifically:10        (a) Arrest Information. All agencies making arrests 11    for offenses which are required by statute to be 12    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 13    State Police shall be responsible for furnishing daily to 14    the Illinois State Police fingerprints, charges and 15    descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such 16    offenses. All such agencies shall also notify the Illinois 17    State Police of all decisions by the arresting agency not 18    to refer such arrests for prosecution. With approval of 19    the Illinois State Police, an agency making such arrests 20    may enter into arrangements with other agencies for the 21    purpose of furnishing daily such fingerprints, charges and 22    descriptions to the Illinois State Police upon its behalf.23        (b) Charge Information. The State's Attorney of each 24    county shall notify the Illinois State Police of all 25    charges filed and all petitions filed alleging that a 26    minor is delinquent, including all those added subsequent   HB5099 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    to the filing of a case, and whether charges were not filed 2    in cases for which the Illinois State Police has received 3    information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph 4    (a) of this Section. With approval of the Illinois State 5    Police, the State's Attorney may enter into arrangements 6    with other agencies for the purpose of furnishing the 7    information required by this subsection (b) to the 8    Illinois State Police upon the State's Attorney's behalf.9        (c) Disposition Information. The clerk of the circuit 10    court of each county shall furnish the Illinois State 11    Police, in the form and manner required by the Supreme 12    Court, with all final dispositions of cases for which the 13    Illinois State Police has received information required to 14    be reported pursuant to paragraph (a) or (d) of this 15    Section. Such information shall include, for each charge, 16    all (1) judgments of not guilty, judgments of guilty 17    including the sentence pronounced by the court with 18    statutory citations to the relevant sentencing provision, 19    findings that a minor is delinquent and any sentence made 20    based on those findings, discharges and dismissals in the 21    court; (2) reviewing court orders filed with the clerk of 22    the circuit court which reverse or remand a reported 23    conviction or findings that a minor is delinquent or that 24    vacate or modify a sentence or sentence made following a 25    trial that a minor is delinquent; (3) continuances to a 26    date certain in furtherance of an order of supervision   HB5099 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    granted under Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of 2    Corrections or an order of probation granted under Section 3    10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 4    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 5    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 6    Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of 7    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 8    Section 10-102 of the Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug 9    Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of the Substance Use 10    Disorder Act, Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act, or 11    Section 5-615 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; (4) 12    judgments or court orders terminating or revoking a 13    sentence to or juvenile disposition of probation, 14    supervision or conditional discharge, judgment or court 15    orders of discharge from probation or conditional 16    discharge, and any resentencing or new court orders 17    entered by a juvenile court relating to the disposition of 18    a minor's case involving delinquency after such 19    revocation; and (5) in any case in which a firearm is 20    alleged to have been used in the commission of an offense, 21    the serial number of any firearm involved in the case, or 22    if the serial number was obliterated, as provided by the 23    State's Attorney to the clerk of the circuit court at the 24    time of disposition. The Illinois State Police may provide 25    reports of cases with missing disposition information to 26    the clerk of the circuit court. Each clerk of the circuit   HB5099 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    court receiving a report of cases with missing disposition 2    information shall respond within 30 days after receiving 3    the report unless the volume of records in the report 4    renders that timeline impracticable. 5        (d) Fingerprints After Sentencing.6            (1) After the court pronounces sentence, sentences 7        a minor following a trial in which a minor was found to 8        be delinquent or issues an order of supervision or an 9        order of probation granted under Section 10 of the 10        Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the Illinois 11        Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 12        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 13        Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 14        12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 15        Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 16        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 17        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, Section 10 of 18        the Steroid Control Act, or Section 5-615 of the 19        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for any offense which is 20        required by statute to be collected, maintained, or 21        disseminated by the Illinois State Police, the State's 22        Attorney of each county shall ask the court to order a 23        law enforcement agency to fingerprint immediately all 24        persons appearing before the court who have not 25        previously been fingerprinted for the same case. The 26        court shall so order the requested fingerprinting, if   HB5099 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1        it determines that any such person has not previously 2        been fingerprinted for the same case. The law 3        enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints to 4        the Illinois State Police daily.5            (2) After the court pronounces sentence or makes a 6        disposition of a case following a finding of 7        delinquency for any offense which is not required by 8        statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated 9        by the Illinois State Police, the prosecuting attorney 10        may ask the court to order a law enforcement agency to 11        fingerprint immediately all persons appearing before 12        the court who have not previously been fingerprinted 13        for the same case. The court may so order the requested 14        fingerprinting, if it determines that any so sentenced 15        person has not previously been fingerprinted for the 16        same case. The law enforcement agency may retain such 17        fingerprints in its files.18        (e) Corrections Information. The Illinois Department 19    of Corrections and the sheriff of each county shall 20    furnish the Illinois State Police with all information 21    concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death, release, 22    pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of 23    executive clemency or discharge of an individual who has 24    been sentenced or committed to the agency's custody for 25    any offenses which are mandated by statute to be 26    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois   HB5099 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    State Police. For an individual who has been charged with 2    any such offense and who escapes from custody or dies 3    while in custody, all information concerning the receipt 4    and escape or death, whichever is appropriate, shall also 5    be so furnished to the Illinois State Police.6        (f) Any entity required to report information 7    concerning criminal arrests, charges, and dispositions 8    pursuant to Section 2.1 or 5 of this Act shall respond to 9    any notice advising the entity of missing or incomplete 10    information or an error in the reporting of the 11    information as follows:12            (1) Responses shall be made within 30 days after 13        the notice from the Illinois State Police unless the 14        volume of records in the report renders that timeline 15        impracticable.16            (2) Responses shall include the missing or 17        incomplete information, correction of the error or an 18        explanation detailing the reason the information 19        cannot be provided or corrected, and an estimated 20        timeframe for compliance. 21        (g) Confidentiality of information. Information 22    reported to the Illinois State Police under this Act is 23    confidential and shall not be released unless expressly 24    permitted by State or federal law.25(Source: P.A. 104-5, eff. 1-1-26; 104-459, eff. 6-1-26.)   HB5099 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    (20 ILCS 2630/3.4 new)2    Sec. 3.4. Criminal history background checks for qualified 3entities. 4    (a) The National Child Protection Act of 1993, as amended 5by the Volunteers for Children Act and the Child Protection 6Improvements Act of 2018, authorizes states to allow 7nationwide background checks for individuals who have access 8to children through qualified entities, including businesses 9and organizations under contract with qualified entities to 10work with vulnerable populations. It is hereby declared as a 11matter of legislative determination that in order to promote 12and protect the health, safety, and welfare of children, the 13elderly, and individuals with disabilities, it is necessary 14and in the public interest to allow nationwide background 15checks as authorized by the National Child Protection Act of 161993, as amended by the Volunteers for Children Act and the 17Child Protection Improvements Act of 2018. 18    (b) As used in this Section:19    "Applicant" includes any person who:20        (1) is employed by or seeks employment with a 21    qualified entity;22        (2) is licensed or seeks licensure with a qualified 23    entity;24        (3) volunteers or seeks to volunteer with a qualified 25    entity; or26        (4) is contracted with or seeks to contract with a   HB5099 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    qualified entity to provide care or care placement 2    services.3    "Care" means the provision of care, treatment, education, 4training, instruction, supervision, or recreation to children, 5the elderly, or individuals with disabilities.6    "Qualified entity" means a business or organization, 7whether public, private, operated for profit, operated not for 8profit, or voluntary, which provides care or care placement 9services, including a business, organization, or governmental 10agency that licenses or certifies others to provide care or 11care placement services for children, the elderly, or 12individuals with disabilities.13    (c) The Illinois State Police shall conduct a State and 14national criminal history background check on an applicant if 15a qualified entity submits:16        (1) a request to the Illinois State Police to perform 17    a State and national background check on the applicant in 18    a form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, 19    which includes a statement containing the name, address, 20    and date of birth appearing on a valid identification card 21    or document issued by the State to the applicant;22        (2) a waiver on a form approved by the Illinois State 23    Police that is signed by the applicant allowing the 24    release of the State and national criminal history record 25    information to the qualified entity;26        (3) the applicant's fingerprints in an electronic   HB5099 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    format that complies with the form and manner for 2    requesting and furnishing criminal history record 3    information prescribed by the Illinois State Police; and4        (4) any fee prescribed by the Illinois State Police.5    (d) The Illinois State Police may charge a fee for 6conducting a background check under this Section. The fee 7shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 8shall not exceed the actual cost of the records check.9    (e) The Illinois State Police shall ensure that the 10applicant is provided written notice of the applicant's right 11to obtain a copy of all records that the Illinois State Police 12shall provide to the qualified entity. If the Illinois State 13Police receives notice from the applicant that the applicant 14wants a copy of the records provided to the qualified entity, 15then the Illinois State Police shall provide the applicant 16with a copy of all the records that the Illinois State Police 17provided to the qualified entity.18    (f) The Illinois State Police shall ensure that the 19applicant is provided written notice of the applicant's right 20to challenge any records that the Illinois State Police shall 21provide to the qualified entity and the procedures for 22correcting or updating the records. The Illinois State Police 23shall make a determination of the validity of a challenge 24concerning Illinois records made by the applicant. If the 25Illinois State Police determines that the Illinois records 26provided to a qualified entity were inaccurate, then the   HB5099 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1Illinois State Police shall provide updated records to the 2qualified entity and the applicant.3    (g) A criminal background check conducted under this 4Section does not constitute compliance with any background 5check required by law.6    (h) Upon positive identification, the Illinois State 7Police shall provide the qualified entity with records of the 8applicant's conviction of or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo 9contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of 10judgment or sentencing, including, but not limited to, 11convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, conditional 12discharge, or first offender probation, under the laws of any 13jurisdiction of the United States that is a felony or crime 14directly related to providing care.15    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to 16require the Illinois State Police to make an eligibility 17determination on behalf of any qualified entity.18    (j) Any information received by a qualified entity under 19this Section shall be used solely for internal purposes in 20determining the suitability of an applicant. The dissemination 21of criminal history information from the Federal Bureau of 22Investigation beyond the authorized state agency or qualified 23entity is prohibited. All criminal record check information 24shall be confidential.25    (k) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to expand 26a government agency's or qualified entity's authority to   HB5099 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1access juvenile, sealed, or expunged records as established by 2State and federal law.3    (l) Fingerprints submitted under this Section shall be 4transmitted through a livescan fingerprint vendor licensed by 5the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. The 6fingerprints submitted under this Section shall be checked 7against the records, now and hereafter filed, in the Illinois 8State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal 9history databases, including, but not limited to, civil, 10criminal, and latent fingerprint databases. The fingerprints 11shall be checked against the records in the Illinois State 12Police databases prior to being submitted to the Federal 13Bureau of Investigation.14    (m) Contractors who have or seek to have a contract with a 15qualified entity to provide care or care placement services 16meet the definition of "employed by" for the purposes of the 17National Child Protection Act of 1993, as amended by the 18Volunteers for Children Act and the Child Protection 19Improvements Act of 2018.20    (n) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules to implement 21this Section. 22    Section 10. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 23changing Section 4.1 as follows: 24    (225 ILCS 10/4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2214.1)  HB5099 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)2    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations.3    (a) In this Section, "third-party vendor" means a 4third-party fingerprinting vendor who is licensed by the 5Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 6regulated by 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1240.600.7    (b) The Department shall require that each child care 8facility license applicant as part of the application process, 9and each employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 10non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 11authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 12employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 13if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 14shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 15may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care 16center, day care home, or group day care home shall authorize 17an investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child 18Care and Development Block Grant. A child care facility, 19non-licensed service provider, day care center, group day care 20home, or day care home may authorize the Department or a 21third-party vendor to collect fingerprints for the 22investigation. If a third-party vendor is used for 23fingerprinting, then the child care facility, non-licensed 24service provider, day care center, group day care home, or day 25care home shall pay the third-party vendor for that service 26directly. If a child care facility, non-licensed service   HB5099 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1provider, day care center, group day care home, or day care 2home authorizes the Department or a third-party vendor to 3collect fingerprints for the investigation, the Director shall 4request and receive information and assistance from any 5federal, State, or local governmental agency as part of the 6authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 7volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 8provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 9volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 10form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 11fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 12now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 13Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 14databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 15conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 16deposited into in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 17exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 18State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 19charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 20against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 21facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 22Department of Children and Family Services when the request is 23made in the form and manner required by the Illinois State 24Police.25    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 26employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or   HB5099 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 2including the source of the information and any conclusions or 3recommendations derived from the information, shall be 4provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 5volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 6provider prior to final action by the Department on the 7application. State conviction information provided by the 8Illinois State Police regarding employees, prospective 9employees, or volunteers of non-licensed service providers and 10child care facilities licensed under this Act shall be 11provided to the operator of such facility, and, upon request, 12to the employee, prospective employee, or volunteer of a child 13care facility or non-licensed service provider. Any 14information concerning criminal charges and the disposition of 15such charges obtained by the Department shall be confidential 16and may not be transmitted outside the Department, except as 17required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within 18the Department except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 19an application or an employee or volunteer of a child care 20facility or non-licensed service provider. Only information 21and standards which bear a reasonable and rational relation to 22the performance of a child care facility shall be used by the 23Department or any licensee. Any employee of the Department of 24Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, or a 25child care facility receiving confidential information under 26this Section who gives or causes to be given any confidential   HB5099 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1information concerning any criminal convictions of an 2applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 3non-licensed service provider, shall be guilty of a Class A 4misdemeanor unless release of such information is authorized 5by this Section.6    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 7June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 8after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 9homes, and group day care homes to hire, on a probationary 10basis, any employee or volunteer authorizing a criminal 11background investigation under this Section after receiving a 12qualifying result, as determined by the Department of Children 13and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, 14whichever is applicable, pursuant to this Act, from either: 15        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 16    criminal background check; or17        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 18    background check and a criminal record check of the 19    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 20    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.21    Pending full clearance of all background check 22requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 23supervised at all times by an individual who received a 24qualifying result on all background check components. 25Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 26or group day care home shall be notified prior to hiring that   HB5099 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1such employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 2background information obtained by the facility.3(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1072, eff. 1-1-26; 4104-307, eff. 1-1-26; revised 10-27-25.) 5    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)6    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. 7    (a) In this Section, "third-party vendor" means a 8third-party fingerprinting vendor who is licensed by the 9Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 10regulated by 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1240.600.11    (b) The Department of Children and Family Services or the 12Department of Early Childhood shall require that each child 13care facility license applicant under the agencies' respective 14authority as part of the application process, and each 15employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 16non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 17authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 18employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 19if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 20shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 21may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care 22center, day care home, or group day care home shall authorize 23an investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child 24Care and Development Block Grant. A child care facility, 25non-licensed service provider, day care center, group day care   HB5099 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1home, or day care home may authorize the Department of 2Children and Family Services, the Department of Early 3Childhood, or a third-party vendor to collect fingerprints for 4the investigation. If a third-party vendor is used for 5fingerprinting, then the child care facility, non-licensed 6service provider, day care center, group day care home, or day 7care home shall pay the third-party vendor for that service 8directly. If a child care facility, non-licensed service 9provider, day care center, group day care home, or day care 10home authorizes the Department of Children and Family 11Services, the Department of Early Childhood, or a third-party 12vendor to collect fingerprints for the investigation, the 13Director of Children and Family Services or the Secretary of 14Early Childhood shall request and receive information and 15assistance from any federal, State, or local governmental 16agency as part of the authorized investigation. Each 17applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 18non-licensed service provider shall submit the applicant's, 19employee's, or volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State 20Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State 21Police. These fingerprints shall be checked against the 22fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois 23State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal 24history records databases. The Illinois State Police shall 25charge a fee for conducting the criminal history records 26check, which shall be deposited into in the State Police   HB5099 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1Services Fund and shall not exceed the actual cost of the 2records check. The Illinois State Police shall provide 3information concerning any criminal charges, and their 4disposition, now or hereafter filed, against an applicant, 5employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 6non-licensed service provider upon request of the Department 7of Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 8Childhood when the request is made in the form and manner 9required by the Illinois State Police.10    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 11employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 12non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 13including the source of the information and any conclusions or 14recommendations derived from the information, shall be 15provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 16volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 17provider prior to final action by the Department of Children 18and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood under 19the agencies' respective authority on the application. State 20conviction information provided by the Illinois State Police 21regarding employees, prospective employees, or volunteers of 22non-licensed service providers and child care facilities 23licensed under this Act shall be provided to the operator of 24such facility, and, upon request, to the employee, prospective 25employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 26non-licensed service provider. Any information concerning   HB5099 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1criminal charges and the disposition of such charges obtained 2by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 3Department of Early Childhood shall be confidential and may 4not be transmitted outside the Department of Children and 5Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, except 6as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 7within the Department of Children and Family Services or the 8Department of Early Childhood except as needed for the purpose 9of evaluating an application or an employee or volunteer of a 10child care facility or non-licensed service provider. Only 11information and standards which bear a reasonable and rational 12relation to the performance of a child care facility shall be 13used by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 14Department of Early Childhood or any licensee. Any employee of 15the Department of Children and Family Services, Department of 16Early Childhood, Illinois State Police, or a child care 17facility receiving confidential information under this Section 18who gives or causes to be given any confidential information 19concerning any criminal convictions of an applicant, employee, 20or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 21provider, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless 22release of such information is authorized by this Section.23    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 24June 30, 2027 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on 25and after July 1, 2027 2026, shall allow day care centers, day 26care homes, and group day care homes to hire, on a probationary   HB5099 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1basis, any employee or volunteer authorizing a criminal 2background investigation under this Section after receiving a 3qualifying result, as determined by the Department of Children 4and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, 5whichever is applicable, pursuant to this Act, from either: 6        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 7    criminal background check; or8        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 9    background check and a criminal record check of the 10    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 11    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.12    Pending full clearance of all background check 13requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 14supervised at all times by an individual who received a 15qualifying result on all background check components. 16Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 17or group day care home shall be notified prior to hiring that 18such employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 19background information obtained by the facility.20    Beginning July 1, 2027, the authority and responsibility 21to conduct a fingerprint-based criminal history check on 22providers of day care at day care centers defined under 23Section 2.09, part day child care facilities defined under 24Section 2.10, day care homes defined under Section 2.18, and 25group day care homes defined under Section 2.20 shall transfer 26to the Department of Early Childhood in accordance with   HB5099 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1Section 80-5 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 2(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 3103-1072, eff. 1-1-26; 104-307, eff. 1-1-26; revised 410-27-25.) 5    Section 15. The Department of Early Childhood Act is 6amended by changing Sections 10-15 and 20-25 as follows: 7    (325 ILCS 3/10-15)8    Sec. 10-15. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    (a) "Eligible infants and toddlers" means infants and 10toddlers under 36 months of age with any of the following 11conditions:12        (1) Developmental delays.13        (2) A physical or mental condition which typically 14    results in developmental delay.15        (3) Being at risk of having substantial developmental 16    delays based on informed clinical opinion.17        (4) Either (A) having entered the program under any of 18    the circumstances listed in paragraphs (1) through (3) of 19    this subsection but no longer meeting the current 20    eligibility criteria under those paragraphs, and 21    continuing to have any measurable delay, or (B) not having 22    attained a level of development in each area, including 23    (i) cognitive, (ii) physical (including vision and 24    hearing), (iii) language, speech, and communication, (iv)   HB5099 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    social or emotional, or (v) adaptive, that is at least at 2    the mean of the child's age equivalent peers; and, in 3    addition to either item (A) or item (B), (C) having been 4    determined by the multidisciplinary individualized family 5    service plan team to require the continuation of early 6    intervention services in order to support continuing 7    developmental progress, pursuant to the child's needs and 8    provided in an appropriate developmental manner. The type, 9    frequency, and intensity of services shall differ from the 10    initial individualized family services plan because of the 11    child's developmental progress, and may consist of only 12    service coordination, evaluation, and assessments.13    "Eligible infants and toddlers" includes any child under 14the age of 3 who is the subject of a substantiated case of 15child abuse or neglect as defined in the federal Child Abuse 16Prevention and Treatment Act.17    (b) "Developmental delay" means a delay in one or more of 18the following areas of childhood development as measured by 19appropriate diagnostic instruments and standard procedures: 20cognitive; physical, including vision and hearing; language, 21speech and communication; social or emotional; or adaptive. 22The term means a delay of 30% or more below the mean in 23function in one or more of those areas.24    (c) "Physical or mental condition which typically results 25in developmental delay" means:26        (1) a diagnosed medical disorder or exposure to a   HB5099 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    toxic substance bearing a relatively well known expectancy 2    for developmental outcomes within varying ranges of 3    developmental disabilities; or4        (2) a history of prenatal, perinatal, neonatal or 5    early developmental events suggestive of biological 6    insults to the developing central nervous system and which 7    either singly or collectively increase the probability of 8    developing a disability or delay based on a medical 9    history.10    (d) "Informed clinical opinion" means both clinical 11observations and parental participation to determine 12eligibility by a consensus of a multidisciplinary team of 2 or 13more members based on their professional experience and 14expertise.15    (e) "Early intervention services" means services which:16        (1) are designed to meet the developmental needs of 17    each child eligible under this Act and the needs of his or 18    her family;19        (2) are selected in collaboration with the child's 20    family;21        (3) are provided under public supervision;22        (4) are provided at no cost except where a schedule of 23    sliding scale fees or other system of payments by families 24    has been adopted in accordance with State and federal law;25        (5) are designed to meet an infant's or toddler's 26    developmental needs in any of the following areas:  HB5099 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1            (A) physical development, including vision and 2        hearing,3            (B) cognitive development,4            (C) communication development,5            (D) social or emotional development, or6            (E) adaptive development;7        (6) meet the standards of the State, including the 8    requirements of this Act;9        (7) include one or more of the following:10            (A) family training,11            (B) social work services, including counseling, 12        and home visits,13            (C) special instruction,14            (D) speech, language pathology and audiology,15            (E) occupational therapy,16            (F) physical therapy,17            (G) psychological services,18            (H) service coordination services,19            (I) medical services only for diagnostic or 20        evaluation purposes,21            (J) early identification, screening, and 22        assessment services,23            (K) health services specified by the lead agency 24        as necessary to enable the infant or toddler to 25        benefit from the other early intervention services,26            (L) vision services,  HB5099 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1            (M) transportation,2            (N) assistive technology devices and services,3            (O) nursing services,4            (P) nutrition services, and5            (Q) sign language and cued language services;6        (8) are provided by qualified personnel, including but 7    not limited to:8            (A) child development specialists or special 9        educators, including teachers of children with hearing 10        impairments (including deafness) and teachers of 11        children with vision impairments (including 12        blindness),13            (B) speech and language pathologists and 14        audiologists,15            (C) occupational therapists,16            (D) physical therapists,17            (E) social workers,18            (F) nurses,19            (G) dietitian nutritionists,20            (H) vision specialists, including ophthalmologists 21        and optometrists,22            (I) psychologists, and23            (J) physicians;24        (9) are provided in conformity with an Individualized 25    Family Service Plan;26        (10) are provided throughout the year; and  HB5099 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1        (11) are provided in natural environments, to the 2    maximum extent appropriate, which may include the home and 3    community settings, unless justification is provided 4    consistent with federal regulations adopted under Sections 5    1431 through 1444 of Title 20 of the United States Code.6    (f) "Individualized Family Service Plan" or "Plan" means a 7written plan for providing early intervention services to a 8child eligible under this Act and the child's family, as set 9forth in Section 10-65.10    (g) "Local interagency agreement" means an agreement 11entered into by local community and State and regional 12agencies receiving early intervention funds directly from the 13State and made in accordance with State interagency agreements 14providing for the delivery of early intervention services 15within a local community area.16    (h) "Council" means the Illinois Interagency Council on 17Early Intervention established under Section 10-30.18    (i) "Lead agency" means the Department of Early Childhood 19which is the State agency responsible for administering this 20Act and receiving and disbursing public funds received in 21accordance with State and federal law and rules. 22    (i-5) "Central billing office" means the central billing 23office created by the lead agency under Section 10-75.24    (j) "Child find" means a service which identifies eligible 25infants and toddlers.26    (k) "Regional intake entity" means the lead agency's   HB5099 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1designated entity responsible for implementation of the Early 2Intervention Services System within its designated geographic 3area.4    (l) "Early intervention provider" means an individual who 5is qualified, as defined by the lead agency, to provide one or 6more types of early intervention services, and who has 7enrolled as a provider in the early intervention program.8    (m) "Fully credentialed early intervention provider" means 9an individual who has met the standards in the State 10applicable to the relevant profession, and has met such other 11qualifications as the lead agency has determined are suitable 12for personnel providing early intervention services, including 13pediatric experience, education, and continuing education. The 14lead agency shall establish these qualifications by rule filed 15no later than 180 days after the effective date of this Act.16    (n) "Telehealth" has the meaning given to that term in 17Section 5 of the Telehealth Act.18    (o) "Department" means Department of Early Childhood 19unless otherwise specified. 20(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.) 21    (325 ILCS 3/20-25)22    Sec. 20-25. Licensing day care facilities. 23    (a) Beginning July 1, 2024, the Department of Early 24Childhood and the Department of Children and Family Services 25shall collaborate and plan for the transition of   HB5099 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1administrative responsibilities related to licensing day care 2centers, day care homes, and group day care homes as 3prescribed throughout the Child Care Act of 1969. 4    (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Early 5Childhood shall manage all facets of licensing for day care 6centers, day care homes, and group day care homes as 7prescribed throughout the Child Care Act of 1969. 8    (c) Beginning July 1, 2027, the authority and 9responsibility to conduct a fingerprint-based criminal history 10check on providers of day care at day care centers defined 11under Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969, part day 12child care facilities defined under Section 2.10 of the Child 13Care Act of 1969, day care homes defined under Section 2.18 of 14the Child Care Act of 1969, and group day care homes defined 15under Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969 shall transfer 16to the Department of Early Childhood in accordance with 17Section 80-5 of this Act.18(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 22represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 23not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 24made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 25Public Act.   HB5099 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 18527 KTG 31970 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law, except that Section 10 takes effect July 1, 2026 3and Section 15 takes effect July 1, 2027.